Washington statutes.
RCW 15.37.130

Injunctions authorized.

The director may bring an action to enjoin the violation or threatened violation of any provision of this chapter or any rule adopted pursuant to this chapter in the superior court of Thurston county, notwithstanding the existence of any other remedy at law.

[ 1961 c 285 s 13.]